Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.040

Effective date for assumption of jurisdiction—Civil causes.

Upon March 13, 1963 the state of Washington shall assume jurisdiction over civil causes of action as set forth in RCW 37.12.010 between Indians or to which Indians are parties which arise in the lands prescribed in RCW 37.12.010 to the same extent that this state has jurisdiction over other civil causes of action and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, those civil laws of this state that are of general application to private persons or private property shall have the same force and effect within such lands as they have elsewhere within this state.

[ 1963 c 36 s 3; 1957 c 240 s 4.]